Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-124.15
Community college culinary education
program; catering license.

A
community college which offers a culinary education program may obtain a catering
license under this section upon applying for and receiving a Class I license
under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act. The catering license shall be issued
for the same period and may be renewed in the same manner as the Class I license.

A community college holding
a catering license and a Class I license under the act may sell alcoholic
beverages only (1) at events held by such culinary education program on the
campus of the community college or (2) at events catered by such culinary
education program as part of the requirements of such program.

Laws 2009, LB232, § 2.